Hawaii statutes.
Chapter 302L

eARLY LEARNING SYSTEM

Section

302L-1 Definitions

302L-1.5 Executive office on early learning;
director;

general functions, duties, and powers

302L-1.6 Early learning advisory board

302L-1.7 Early childhood education facilities;
pre-plus

302L-2 Early learning system; keiki first steps

302L-3 Repealed

302L-3.5 Advisory board meetings by teleconference

302L-4 Keiki first steps grant program;
establishment

302L-5 Early learning trust fund

302L-6 Federal funds

302L-7 Executive office on early learning public

prekindergarten program; public preschools

Note

Executive office on early learning public prekindergarten
program; reports to 2016-2018 legislature. L 2015, c 109, §4.

Working group on age-appropriate development for children
from birth to age five years who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind;
reports to 2017-2018 legislature (ceases to exist June 30, 2018). L 2016, c
177, §3.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next